Washington statutes.
RCW 9.01.120

Civil remedies preserved.

The omission to specify or affirm in this act any liability to any damages, penalty, forfeiture or other remedy, imposed by law, and allowed to be recovered or enforced in any civil action or proceeding, for any act or omission declared punishable herein, shall not affect any right to recover or enforce the same.

[ 1909 c 249 s 44; RRS s 2296.]

NOTES:

Effect—1909 c 249: "The repeal or abrogation by this act of any existing law shall not revive any former law heretofore repealed, nor affect any right already existing or accrued or any action or proceeding already taken, except as in this act provided; nor does it repeal any private statute or statute affecting civil rights or liabilities not expressly repealed." [ 1909 c 249 s 50.] "this act" (chapter 249, Laws of 1909) has been codified as follows: RCW 9.01.010- 9.01.050, 9.01.060, 9.01.070, 9.01.090- 9.01.114, 9.01.120, 9.01.130, 9.01.150- 9.01.190, 9.02.010- 9.02.050, 9.04.020, 9.04.030, 9.05.010- 9.05.050, 9.05.150, 9.05.160, 9.08.010- 9.08.040, 9.09.010- 9.09.060, 9.11.010- 9.11.050, 9.12.010- 9.12.020, 9.15.010, 9.15.020, 9.16.010- 9.16.070, 9.16.100- 9.16.150, 9.18.010- 9.18.110, 9.19.010- 9.19.050, 9.22.010- 9.22.030, 9.23.010, 9.24.010- 9.24.050, 9.26.010, 9.26.020, 9.27.010- 9.27.100, 9.30.010- 9.30.050, 9.31.010- 9.31.090, 9.33.010- 9.33.060, 9.34.010, 9.34.020, 9.37.010- 9.37.040, 9.38.010- 9.38.030, 9.38.050, 9.40.010- 9.40.040, 9.41.180, 9.41.230- 9.41.260, 9.44.010- 9.44.080, 9.45.010- 9.45.060, 9.45.070- 9.45.120, 9.45.150- 9.45.170, 9.47.080- 9.47.100, 9.47.120, 9.47.130, 9.48.010- 9.48.170, 9.51.010- 9.51.060, 9.52.030, 9.52.040, 9.54.010, 9.54.060- 9.54.110, 9.54.120, 9.54.130, 9.55.010, 9.55.020, 9.58.010- 9.58.090, 9.58.110, 9.58.120, 9.59.010- 9.59.050, 9.61.010- 9.61.070, 9.62.010, 9.62.020, 9.65.010- 9.65.030, 9.66.010- 9.66.050, 9.68.010, 9.68.020, 9.68.030, 9.69.010- 9.69.090, 9.72.010- 9.72.110, 9.73.010, 9.73.020, 9.75.010, 9.75.020, 9.76.020- 9.76.050, 9.79.010- 9.79.120, 9.80.010- 9.80.050, 9.82.010- 9.82.030, 9.83.010, 9.83.060, 9.86.020, 9.86.030, 9.87.010, 9.91.010, 9.91.070- 9.91.090, 9.92.010- 9.92.060, 9.92.080- 9.92.120, 10.01.060, 10.01.110, 10.19.010, 10.37.020, 10.43.010, 10.43.030- 10.43.050, 10.46.010, 10.46.050, 10.46.090, 10.52.030, 10.52.060, 10.52.090, 10.58.020, 10.58.040, 10.61.010, 19.60.010- 19.60.060, 22.32.010- 22.32.050, 26.04.240, 26.28.060, 26.28.070, 36.28.100, 40.16.010- 40.16.030, 42.04.040, 42.20.010- 42.20.100, 49.44.020- 49.44.080, 59.12.230, 66.44.230- 66.44.250, 68.08.100, 68.08.110, 68.08.140, 68.24.190, 69.40.030- 69.40.050, 70.54.010, 70.54.020, 70.54.050, 70.54.070, 70.54.080, 70.74.270- 70.74.300, 71.08.010, 71.08.020, 76.04.220, 81.40.100, 81.48.010, 81.48.020, 81.48.060, 81.56.150, 81.56.160, 81.60.070, 88.08.020, 88.08.030, 88.08.050, 88.08.060.